California statutes. Elections Code
 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 5002, 5007, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5019, 5020, 5021, 5022

5300.07--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018

5302.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1014, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032

5313.02--the following census blocks:

4010

5318.00--the following census blocks:

3009

5319.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002

5333.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000,
 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005

9800.36--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067

ORANGE

Whole Tracts in Orange County

0117.17, 0218.02, 0218.07, 0218.09, 0218.12, 0218.13, 0218.16, 0218.17, 0218.22, 0218.23, 0218.24, 0218.25, 0218.27, 0218.28, 0218.29, 0218.30, 0218.31, 0218.32, 0219.03

Partial Tracts in Orange County

0014.03--the
 following census blocks:

1000, 1001

0015.01--the following census blocks:

3009

0015.06--the following census blocks:

2000, 2014, 2015

0015.07--the following census blocks:

3025

0117.07--the following census blocks:

4000

0117.09--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2007, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025

0117.14--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1017, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1037

0117.18--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2013, 2019

0218.10--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006

0218.14--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009,
 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4017, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031

0218.20--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2025, 2026, 2027

0218.21--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011

0218.26--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1020, 1022, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018

0219.05--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011

0219.15--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 3000, 3001, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4014

0219.19--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1004, 1005,
 1010, 2001, 2002, 2003

0219.21--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017

0219.22--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1005, 1008, 1009

0219.24--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3045, 3056, 3057, 3058

0864.07--the following census blocks:

4002

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21439.

Congressional District 39 consists of the following:

Partial Counties in Congressional District 39

RIVERSIDE

Whole Tracts in Riverside County

0301.01, 0301.03, 0301.04, 0302.00, 0303.00, 0304.00, 0305.01, 0305.02, 0305.03, 0306.02, 0306.03, 0306.04, 0306.05, 0307.00, 0308.00, 0309.00, 0310.01, 0310.02, 0311.00, 0312.00, 0313.00, 0314.01, 0314.02, 0315.01, 0315.03, 0315.04, 0316.01, 0316.02, 0317.01, 0317.02, 0317.03, 0317.04, 0401.01, 0401.02, 0402.01, 0402.02, 0402.03, 0402.04, 0403.02, 0403.03, 0403.04, 0403.05, 0404.02, 0404.03, 0404.04, 0404.05, 0405.01, 0405.02, 0405.03, 0406.04, 0406.05, 0406.06, 0409.01, 0409.02, 0409.03, 0409.04, 0410.01, 0410.02,
 0410.03, 0411.01, 0411.02, 0412.01, 0412.02, 0412.03, 0413.01, 0413.02, 0414.03, 0414.06, 0414.07, 0414.08, 0414.11, 0420.10, 0420.12, 0420.15, 0420.16, 0420.17, 0420.18, 0422.07, 0422.08, 0422.10, 0422.17, 0424.02, 0424.03, 0424.04, 0424.05, 0424.06, 0424.07, 0424.08, 0424.09, 0424.10, 0424.11, 0425.05, 0425.07, 0425.08, 0425.09, 0425.10, 0425.11, 0425.12, 0425.13, 0425.14, 0425.15, 0425.16, 0425.17, 0425.18, 0425.19, 0425.20, 0425.21, 0425.22, 0425.23, 0426.21, 0426.22, 0426.25, 0426.27, 0426.28, 0426.29, 0426.30, 0426.31, 0426.32, 0427.46, 0427.47, 0428.01, 0428.02, 0429.05, 0429.06, 0429.08, 0465.01, 0465.02, 0467.00, 0468.00, 0483.00, 0487.00, 0488.00, 0489.01, 0489.02, 0511.00, 9800.04

Partial Tracts in Riverside County

0406.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019,
 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037

0406.16--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2006, 2007, 2009, 2021, 2022, 2023

0406.18--the following census blocks:

3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3070, 3071, 3072, 3073, 3074, 3084, 3085, 3086, 3087, 3088, 3089, 3090, 3095, 3096, 3097, 3098, 3099, 3100, 3101, 3102, 3103, 3104, 3105, 3106, 3107, 3108, 3109, 3110, 3111, 3112, 3113

0406.22--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010

0407.03--the following census blocks:

1008, 1014

0410.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030

0414.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008

0414.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004,
 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014

0414.10--the following census blocks:

1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007

0414.12--the following census blocks:

1004, 1005, 1006, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040

0414.13--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003,
 1004, 1012, 1013

0414.14--the following census blocks:

2009, 2010

0414.15--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2010, 3003, 3004, 3014, 3027, 3028, 3029

0420.03--the following census blocks:

3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009

0420.04--the following census blocks:

1015, 1016

0420.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3014, 3015, 3017, 3018

0420.08--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022

0420.09--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016

0422.06--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 4000, 4001,
 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007

0422.09--the following census blocks:

1001, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010

0422.12--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009

0422.13--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020

0422.14--the following census blocks:

1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1037, 1038, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018

0423.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 2017, 2027, 2028, 2032, 2033, 3045

0424.01--the following census blocks:

1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034

0424.12--the following census blocks:

1005, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1022, 1023, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018

0426.23--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2009, 2017, 2018, 2019

0426.24--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2049, 2050

0426.26--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3013, 3014, 3017, 3018, 3021, 3027, 3028, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036

0427.09--the following census blocks:

1014, 3004, 3005

0427.17--the following census blocks:

2008, 2009

0427.19--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034

0427.20--the following census blocks:

3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3024

0427.28--the following census blocks:

1008, 1009

0427.30--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1047, 1048

0427.31--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1006, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1036, 1055, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015

0427.32--the following census blocks:

3000, 3018

0427.49--the following census blocks:

2000, 3000, 3012

0427.50--the following census blocks:

1000, 1002, 1003

0429.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 3000, 3009, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030

0429.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012,
 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3010, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015

0429.07--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044

0438.22--the following census blocks:

1058

0490.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001,
 2002, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3011

0490.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2009

0509.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025

0509.02--the following census blocks:

1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3006, 3011, 3016

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21440.

Congressional District 40 consists of the following:

Partial Counties in Congressional District 40

ORANGE

Whole Tracts in Orange County

0219.12, 0219.16, 0219.17, 0219.20, 0219.23, 0320.02, 0320.03, 0320.20, 0320.28, 0320.30, 0320.31, 0320.32, 0320.33, 0320.34, 0320.35, 0320.36, 0320.37, 0320.38, 0320.39, 0320.41, 0320.42, 0320.43, 0320.44, 0320.45, 0320.46, 0320.48, 0320.50, 0320.51, 0320.53, 0320.54, 0320.55, 0320.65, 0758.09, 0758.10, 0758.11, 0758.12, 0758.13, 0758.14, 0762.08

Partial Tracts in Orange County

0218.26--the following census blocks:

1012, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1021, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027

0219.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014

0219.13--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006

0219.15--the following census blocks:

1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3002, 3003,
 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 4000, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013

0219.18--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007

0219.19--the following census blocks:

1003, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1011, 2000, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011

0219.21--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003

0219.22--the following census blocks:

1002, 1003, 1004, 1006, 1007, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006,
 4007, 4008, 4009

0219.24--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3010, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3043, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3059, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009

0320.11--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020,
 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034

0320.12--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 3000, 3005, 3006, 3010

0320.13--the following census blocks:

1009, 2003, 2013, 3002

0320.15--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 4006, 4007

0320.22--the following census blocks:

4000

0320.27--the following census blocks:

2000,
 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007

0320.40--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004

0320.47--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003

0320.49--the following census blocks:

1000, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012

0320.57--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016

0320.64--the following census blocks:

3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012

0320.66--the following census blocks:

2010, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5004, 5005, 5007, 6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 6008

0524.19--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001

0524.23--the following census blocks:

3006, 3007

0524.28--the following census blocks:

1002, 1003,
 1019, 1020, 2000, 2001, 2008, 4006

0524.30--the following census blocks:

7001, 9000, 9001, 9003, 9004, 9005, 9006, 9014, 9015, 9016, 9017, 9018, 9019, 9037, 9038, 9039, 9040, 9041

0524.37--the following census blocks:

5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5020, 5021, 5023, 5024, 5025, 5026, 5027, 5053, 5054

0756.04--the following census blocks:

4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 6000, 6001

0756.05--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010,
 5011, 5012, 5013

0758.15--the following census blocks:

1006

0758.16--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008

0762.02--the following census blocks:

2000, 3000, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010

0762.05--the following census blocks:

3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006

0762.06--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006

RIVERSIDE

Whole Tracts in Riverside County

0418.03, 0418.04, 0418.06, 0418.07, 0418.08, 0418.09, 0418.10, 0419.09, 0419.10, 0419.12, 0419.13, 0419.14, 0419.15, 0420.07, 0427.08, 0427.11, 0427.14, 0427.16, 0427.24, 0427.33, 0427.38, 0427.39, 0427.40, 0427.41, 0427.42, 0427.43, 0427.48, 0427.51, 0427.52, 0430.01, 0430.03, 0430.05, 0430.06, 0430.07, 0430.08, 0430.09, 0430.10, 0432.06, 0432.09, 0432.10, 0432.11, 0432.27, 0432.28, 0432.29, 0432.70, 0432.71, 0432.72, 0432.74, 0432.76, 0432.78, 0432.79, 0464.01, 0464.02, 0464.03, 0464.04, 0464.05, 0479.01, 0479.02, 0481.00, 0497.01, 0497.02, 0498.00, 0503.01, 0504.01, 0504.02, 0505.02, 0506.00, 0507.02

Partial Tracts in Riverside County

0406.09--the following census blocks:

4031, 4032

0414.04--the following census blocks:

1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016

0414.05--the following census blocks:

1023

0414.10--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1013

0414.13--the following census blocks:

1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012

0414.14--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008

0414.15--the following census blocks:

1009, 2002, 2003, 2004,
 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026

0416.02--the following census blocks:

1005, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032

0417.02--the following census blocks:

3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015

0418.05--the following census blocks:

1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009

0418.12--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004,
 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016

0418.13--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017

0419.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 3003, 3004, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018

0419.05--the following census blocks:

1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009

0420.03--the following
 census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021

0420.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017

0420.05--the following census blocks:

1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013,
 3016

0420.08--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031

0420.09--the following census blocks:

1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035,
 1036, 3008, 3009, 4011

0427.09--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012

0427.17--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011

0427.26--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035

0427.28--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041

0427.30--the following census blocks:

1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043,
 1044, 1045, 1046, 1049, 1050, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017

0427.31--the following census blocks:

1005, 1007, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3016, 3017

0427.32--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005,
 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029

0427.37--the following census blocks:

1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1077, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093

0427.49--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024

0427.50--the following census blocks:

1001, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019,
 1020, 1021, 1022, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040

0429.02--the following census blocks:

3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3010, 3011, 3020, 3032, 3033, 3034, 4015, 4031

0429.03--the following census blocks:

2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028

0429.07--the following census blocks:

2033, 2034, 2035, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048

0432.35--the following
 census blocks:

1006, 1007, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1074, 2032

0432.54--the following census blocks:

1019, 1024, 1031, 1032, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1047, 1048

0496.00--the following census blocks:

2010, 2011

0503.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006

0505.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007,
 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3011, 3012, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018

0505.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3009, 3010

0507.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008,
 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019

0512.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1035, 1036, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21441.

Congressional District 41 consists of the following:

Partial Counties in Congressional District 41

LOS ANGELES

Whole Tracts in Los Angeles County

5002.03, 5013.01, 5013.02, 5014.00, 5015.03, 5015.04, 5017.00, 5018.02, 5018.03, 5018.04, 5019.00, 5020.03, 5020.04, 5020.05, 5024.01, 5024.02, 5025.00, 5026.02, 5026.03, 5026.04, 5027.00, 5028.01, 5029.01, 5030.00, 5031.03, 5031.04, 5031.05, 5031.06, 5032.01, 5032.02, 5033.01, 5033.02, 5034.01, 5034.02, 5035.01, 5035.02, 5036.01, 5036.02, 5037.01, 5037.02, 5037.04, 5037.05, 5038.01, 5038.02, 5039.01, 5039.02, 5040.01, 5040.02, 5041.01, 5042.00, 5339.01, 5339.02, 5340.01, 5340.02, 5341.01, 5341.02, 5342.01, 5342.02,
 5342.03, 5501.01, 5502.01, 5502.02, 5503.01, 5505.01, 5505.02, 5506.01, 5506.02, 5507.00, 5508.01, 5508.02, 5509.01, 5509.02, 5510.01, 5510.02, 5511.01, 5511.02, 5512.01, 5512.03, 5512.04, 5513.00, 5514.01, 5514.02, 5515.01, 5515.02, 5517.00, 5518.01, 5518.02, 5523.01, 5523.02, 5524.00, 5531.00, 5532.01, 5532.02, 5533.00, 5534.00, 5540.01, 5540.02, 5541.01, 5541.05, 5541.06, 5542.01, 5542.03, 5542.04, 5543.01, 5543.02, 5544.03, 5544.04, 5544.05, 5544.06, 5552.02, 5553.00, 5700.01, 5700.02, 5700.03, 5707.01, 5707.03, 5708.00, 5709.01, 5709.02, 5711.01, 5711.02, 5712.02, 5713.00, 5714.00, 5778.00, 9800.12, 9800.34

Partial Tracts in Los Angeles County

4087.03--the following census blocks:

1007

5002.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002,
 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017

5010.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 2013

5010.02--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2010, 2018, 3012, 3019, 3021

5012.00--the following census blocks:

1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2012, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2023, 2025, 2026, 2028, 2029, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2039

5015.01--the following census
 blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023

5016.00--the following census blocks:

1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1034, 1035, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006

5021.00--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 3009, 3010

5022.00--the following census
 blocks:

3015

5023.03--the following census blocks:

2000, 2020, 2025, 5000, 5001, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5008, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 5023, 5024, 5025

5519.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2009, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4012

5520.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005

5520.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006,
 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009

5522.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3010

5550.01--the following census blocks:

1007

5550.02--the following census blocks:

2010

5701.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010

5702.04--the following census blocks:

1004

5706.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1008

5710.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 6004, 6005, 6006, 6007, 6008

5712.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007

5720.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1017

5736.01--the
 following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 6004, 6005, 6006, 6007, 6008, 6009, 6010, 7000, 7001, 7002, 7003, 7004, 7005, 7006, 7007, 7008, 7009, 8000, 8001, 8002, 8003, 8004, 8005, 8006, 8007, 8008, 9000, 9001, 9002, 9003, 9004, 9005, 9006, 9007

5737.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2010, 2011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019

5738.00--the
 following census blocks:
